test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-naver_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:


  Noun - naver: # 2B
    naver+N+Sg+Nom: naver
    naver+N+Sg+Gen: nahhaar
    naver+N+Sg+Acc: nahhaar
    naver+N+Sg+Ill: naharân
    naver+N+Sg+Loc: naharist
    naver+N+Sg+Com: naharáin
    naver+N+Sg+Abe: nahhaarttáá
    naver+N+Ess: naverin                    #naharin
    naver+N+Par: naverid                    #naharid
    naver+N+Pl+Nom: nahareh
    naver+N+Pl+Gen: naharij
    naver+N+Pl+Acc: naharijd
    naver+N+Pl+Ill: naharáid
    naver+N+Pl+Loc: naharijn
    naver+N+Pl+Com: naharijguin
    naver+N+Pl+Abe: naharijttáá
